Utah statutes.
63M-7-205.   Annual report by the commission.
(1)  The commission shall annually prepare and publish a report directed to
the governor, the Legislature, and the Judicial Council.
(2)  The report shall describe how the commission fulfilled its statutory
purposes and duties during the year.
